Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. PAUL; REDEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $18,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul to predesign, design, construct, and equip improvements to streets and public infrastructure to support redevelopment of blighted property in the Midway area in the city of St. Paul. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation includes money for transit facilities, rights-of-way or permanent easements, sidewalks, utilities, sewer, stormwater systems, landscaping, lighting, parking facilities, and other site improvements and amenities. The city must enter into a lease or management agreement for the operation of any parking facility, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, "blighted property in the Midway area" means property within the boundary of Snelling Avenue to the west, University Avenue to the north, marked Interstate Highway 94 to the south, and Pascal Street to the east that was adversely affected by civil unrest, including severe damage and destruction of property, during the peacetime emergency declared in Emergency Executive Order 20-64, in May of 2020. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $18,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end